Utah statutes.
30-3-39.   Mediation program.
(1)  There is established a mandatory domestic mediation program to help
reduce the time and tensions associated with obtaining a divorce.
(2)  If, after the filing of an answer to a complaint of divorce, there are
any remaining contested issues, the parties shall participate in good faith in
at least one session of mediation.  This requirement does not preclude the
entry of pretrial orders before mediation takes place.
(3)  The parties shall use a mediator qualified to mediate domestic disputes
under criteria established by the Judicial Council in accordance with Section
78B-6-205.
(4)  Unless otherwise ordered by the court or the parties agree upon a
different payment arrangement, the cost of mediation shall be divided equally
between the parties.
(5)  The director of dispute resolution programs for the courts, the court, or
the mediator may excuse either party from the requirement to mediate for good
cause.
(6)  Mediation shall be conducted in accordance with the Utah Rules of Court-
Annexed Alternative Dispute Resolution.
